Utah statutes.
67-19a-407.   Appeal to Career Service Review Board.
(1) (a)  The employee or the agency may appeal the hearing officer's decision
on a grievance to the board if:
(i)  the appealing party files a notice of appeal with the administrator
within 10 working days after the receipt of the decision or the expiration of
the period for decision, whichever is first; and
(ii)  the appealing party meets the requirements for appeal established in
Subsection (2).
(b)  The appealing party shall submit a copy of the official transcript of the
hearing to the administrator.
(2)  The employee or the agency may appeal the hearing officer's decision on a
grievance to the board only if the appealing party alleges that:
(a)  the hearing officer did not issue a decision within 20 working days after
the hearing adjourned;
(b)  the appealing party is dissatisfied with the decision;
(c)  the appealing party believes that the decision was based upon an
incorrect or arbitrary interpretation of the facts; or
(d)  the appealing party believes that the hearing officer made an erroneous
conclusion of law.
